dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="róż/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="brz/oza__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>oza</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozę</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozy</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozie</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozie</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozą</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozo</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozy</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozy</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>óz</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozom</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozach</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozami</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ozy</l><r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chłop/iec__n_mp">
      <e><p>          <l>iec</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ca</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ca</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cu</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cu</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cem</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cze</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cy</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ców</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ców</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>com</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cach</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cami</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cy</l><r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nau/ka__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kę</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ką</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ko</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>k</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kom</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kach</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kami</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gal__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="słońc/e__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="biblioteka"><i>bibliote</i><par n="nau/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="brzoza"><i>brz</i><par n="brz/oza__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="chłopiec"><i>chłop</i><par n="chłop/iec__n_mp"/></e>
    <e lm="cukrzyca"><i>cukrzyc</i><par n="róż/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fizyka"><i>fizy</i><par n="nau/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gal"><i>gal</i><par n="gal__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="mgławica"><i>mgławic</i><par n="róż/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="miejsce"><i>miejsc</i><par n="słońc/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nauka"><i>nau</i><par n="nau/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="praca"><i>prac</i><par n="róż/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="republika"><i>republi</i><par n="nau/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="róża"><i>róż</i><par n="róż/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="słońce"><i>słońc</i><par n="słońc/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tablica"><i>tablic</i><par n="róż/a__n_f"/></e>
